Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.786

Budget calculation—Student financial aid programs.

It is the policy of the state of Washington that financial need not be a barrier to participation in higher education. It is also the policy of the state of Washington that the essential requirements level budget calculation include funding for state student financial aid programs. The calculation should, at a minimum, include a funding level equal to the amount provided in the second year of the previous biennium in the omnibus appropriations act, adjusted for the percentage of needy resident students, by educational sector, likely to be included in any enrollment increases necessary to maintain, by educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal year. The calculation should also be adjusted to reflect, by educational sector, any increases in cost of attendance. The cost of attendance figures should be calculated by the office of financial management and provided to the appropriate legislative committees by June 30th of each even-numbered year.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 138; 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 28B.10.776.